Utah statutes.
16-10a-1504.   Amended application for authority to transact business.

(1)  A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall deliver an amended application for authority to transact business to the division for filing if the foreign corporation changes:

(a)  its corporate name or its assumed corporate name;

(b)  the period of its duration;

(c)  the state or country of its incorporation; or

(d)  any of the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1).

(2)  The requirements of Section 16-10a-1503 for obtaining an original application for authority to transact business apply to filing an amended application for authority to transact business under this section.

